apertium-trw.trw.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for trw

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>     ! Noun
%<adj%>   ! Adjective 
%<post%>  ! Postposition
%<prn%>   ! Pronoun
%<adv%>   ! Adverb
%<conj%>  ! Conjunction
%<inter%> ! Interjection



! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
Adjectives ;
Postpositions ;
Pronouns ;
Adverbs ;
Conjunction ;
Interjection :




LEXICON RegNounInfl

%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: # ;


LEXICON POST

%<post%>: # ;


LEXICON PRN

%<prn%>: # ;


LEXICON ADV 

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON CONJ

%<conj%>: # ;

LEXICON INTER

%<inter%>: # ;






!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Pronouns

آ:آ PRN ;
امَن:امَن PRN ;
ہے:ہے PRN ;
ہِین:ہِین PRN ;
کا:کا PRN ;
کامیک:کامیک PRN ;
کیس:کیس PRN ;
کینئس:کینئس PRN ;
کیںیں:کیںیں PRN ;
کا:کا PRN ;
کآم:کآم PRN ;
کَھدات:کَھدات PRN ;
کِھین:کِھین PRN ;
کِسی:کِسی PRN ;
مأ:مأ PRN ;
مے:مے PRN ;
مھے:مھے PRN ;
مِھن:مِھن PRN ;
مھو:مھو PRN ;
مھوئے:مھوئے PRN ;
مُھن:مُھن PRN ;
پَۓ:پَۓ PRN ;

LEXICON Adverbs

امَنا:امَنا ADV ;
اَسُودا:اَسُودا ADV ;
اجَن:اجَن ADV ;
علاوہ:علاوہ ADV ;
ہأئیمُو:ہأئیمُو ADV ;
ہیدیک:ہیدیک ADV ;

LEXICON Conjunctions

آں:آں CONJ ;
اَسے:اَسے	CONJ ;
اما:اما	CONJ ;
بَنے:بَنے	CONJ ;
بھی:بھی	CONJ ;
بوأکے:بوأکے CONJ ;	
پیَز:پیَز	CONJ ;
خانا پورے:خانا پورے CONJ ;	
خو:خو CONJ ;	
سَیم:سَیم	CONJ ;
شات:شات	CONJ ;
کئیکے:کئیکے CONJ ;	
کچرے:کچرے CONJ ;	
کھأگودُو:کھأگودُو	CONJ ;
کو:کو CONJ ;
کو:کو CONJ ;
گڈسرہ:گڈسرہ CONJ ;	
گوأکے:گوأکے CONJ ;	
نأؤ:نأؤ	CONJ ;
نکئ کی نأ :نکئ کی نأ CONJ ;	
ہُم:ہُم	CONJ ;
و:و	CONJ ;
یأ:یأ CONJ ;	
یا:یا CONJ ;

LEXICON Interjections

آ:آ INTER ;	
أبأ:أبأ INTER ;		
اخّ:اخّ INTER ;		
اَݜ:اَݜ INTER ;		
اقّا:اقّا INTER ;		
اَلآ:اَلآ INTER ;		
او:او INTER ;		
اے:اے INTER ;		
بأ:بأ INTER ;		
بچُو:بچُو INTER ;		
بڑبڑ یے:بڑبڑ یے INTER ;		
بُومارِک:بُومارِک INTER ;		
پأ:پأ INTER ;		
پِشو:پِشو INTER ;		
پِشے:پِشے INTER ;		
تَت:تَت INTER ;		
تتے:تتے INTER ;		
تخے:تخے INTER ;		
تو یے:تو یے INTER ;		
تی تی:تی تی INTER ;		
ٹشے:ٹشے INTER ;		
ٹوش یے:ٹوش یے INTER ;		
چوہو:چوہو INTER ;	
خا:خا INTER ;







 
! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

LEXICON NounRoot
آبادی:آبادی RegNounInfl ; 
اچار:اچار RegNounInfl ;
آدت:آدت RegNounInfl ;
اَدوس:اَدوس RegNounInfl ;
آدُوم:آدُوم RegNounInfl ; 
افلَتے:افلَتے RegNounInfl ;
اَگھراڑ:اَگھراڑ RegNounInfl ;
اغَز:اغَز RegNounInfl ; 
اَہاڑ:اَہاڑ RegNounInfl ; 
احکام:احکام RegNounInfl ;
آیندہ:آیندہ RegNounInfl ;
اجل:اجل RegNounInfl ;
اجَر:اجَر RegNounInfl ; 
آل:آل RegNounInfl ; 
الا:الا RegNounInfl ; 
آلو:آلو RegNounInfl ;
آلوک:آلوک RegNounInfl ;
عمل:عمل RegNounInfl ; 
امبار:امبار RegNounInfl ;
امبُور:امبُور RegNounInfl ;
اموݜا:اموݜا RegNounInfl ;
آن:آن RegNounInfl ; 
آنہ:آنہ RegNounInfl ; 
اندازہ:اندازہ RegNounInfl ;
اندر:اندر RegNounInfl ; 
آنڈل:آنڈل RegNounInfl ; 
اَنڈیوال:اَنڈیوال RegNounInfl ;
انگئ:انگئ RegNounInfl ; 
انگٹی:انگٹی RegNounInfl ; 
انگُشتان:انگُشتان RegNounInfl ;
انگُوٹ:انگُوٹ RegNounInfl ; 
عقل:عقل RegNounInfl ; 
آر:آر RegNounInfl ; 
آرَت:آرَت RegNounInfl ;  
میلأݜ:میلأݜ RegNounInfl ; 
بُھم:بُھم RegNounInfl;
آسو:آسو  RegNounInfl  ; 
آش:آش  RegNounInfl  ;
آݜ:آݜ  RegNounInfl ;
آݜان:آݜان RegNounInfl ;
آݜوکھا:آݜوکھا RegNounInfl ;
آفت:آفت RegNounInfl ; 
آگن:آگن RegNounInfl ;
آگو:آگو RegNounInfl ;
آل:آل RegNounInfl ;
آلہ:آلہ RegNounInfl ;
آلو:آلو RegNounInfl ; 
آلوان:آلوان RegNounInfl ;
آلوک:آلوک RegNounInfl ;
آم:آم RegNounInfl ;
آمو:آمو RegNounInfl ;
آن:آن RegNounInfl ; 
آنار:آنار RegNounInfl ;
آنڈ:آنڈ RegNounInfl ;
آنگو:آنگو RegNounInfl ;
آنہ:آنہ RegNounInfl ;
أٹھأس:أٹھأس RegNounInfl ; 
أٹھیلأئ:أٹھیلأئ RegNounInfl ;
أخأن:أخأن RegNounInfl ;
أڈھیل:أڈھیل RegNounInfl ;
أر:أر RegNounInfl ;
أرأن:أرأن RegNounInfl ; 
أرھأ:أرھأ RegNounInfl ;
أزأدی:أزأدی RegNounInfl ;
أڑ:أڑ RegNounInfl ;
أڑی:أڑی RegNounInfl ;
أسأنی:أسأنی RegNounInfl ; 
أشیم:أشیم RegNounInfl ;
أݜی:أݜی RegNounInfl ;
أݜیئی:أݜیئی RegNounInfl ;
أݜینیر:أݜینیر RegNounInfl ;
أغأت:أغأت RegNounInfl ; 
أقأت:أقأت RegNounInfl ;
أک:أک RegNounInfl ;
أگأیئ:أگأیئ RegNounInfl ;
ألیئ:ألیئ RegNounInfl ;
أمجیلأ:أمجیلأ RegNounInfl ; 
أنچِک:أنچِک RegNounInfl ;
أمِیل:أمِیل RegNounInfl ;
أنگ:أنگ RegNounInfl ;
أں:أں RegNounInfl ; 
اَئی:اَئی RegNounInfl ;
اباسین:اباسین RegNounInfl ;
اِبر:اِبر RegNounInfl ;
اُبڑی:اُبڑی RegNounInfl ;
اِبلیس:اِبلیس RegNounInfl ; 
اِبھین:اِبھین RegNounInfl ;
اُپھاٹ:اُپھاٹ RegNounInfl ;
اُپھڈاچا:اُپھڈاچا RegNounInfl ;
اتر:اتر RegNounInfl ;
اتھان:اتھان RegNounInfl ; 
اُتھیلیئ:اُتھیلیئ RegNounInfl ;
اتیفاق:اتیفاق RegNounInfl ;
اثر:اثر RegNounInfl ;
اٹال:اٹال RegNounInfl ;
اٹکل:اٹکل RegNounInfl ; 
اُٹل:اُٹل RegNounInfl ;
اِجازہ:اِجازہ RegNounInfl ;
اَجدھا:اَجدھا RegNounInfl ;
اجدھام:اجدھام RegNounInfl ;
اچار:اچار RegNounInfl ; 
احکام:احکام RegNounInfl ;
اَخاڑا:اَخاڑا RegNounInfl ;
اخلاص:اخلاص RegNounInfl ;
اخلاق:اخلاق RegNounInfl ;
اخور:اخور RegNounInfl ; 
ادام:ادام RegNounInfl ;
ادب:ادب RegNounInfl ;
اِذن:اِذن RegNounInfl ;
اَر:اَر RegNounInfl ;
اُرانئ:اُرانئ RegNounInfl ; 
اَردی:اَردی RegNounInfl ;
اَرزئیل:اَرزئیل RegNounInfl ;
ارزا:ارزا RegNounInfl ;
اُری:اُری RegNounInfl ;
بأٹ:بأٹ RegNounInfl ;
بأچیئ:بأچیئ RegNounInfl ;
بأر:بأر RegNounInfl ;
بأرین:بأرین RegNounInfl ;
بأڙُو:بأڙُو RegNounInfl ;
بأس:بأس RegNounInfl ;
بأسے:بأسے RegNounInfl ;
بأنگیڑَئ:بأنگیڑَئ RegNounInfl ;
بابُو:بابُو RegNounInfl ;
بات:بات RegNounInfl ;
باتھر:باتھر RegNounInfl ;
باتی:باتی RegNounInfl ;
باٹ:باٹ RegNounInfl ;
باجا:باجا RegNounInfl ;
باروت:باروت RegNounInfl ;
باری:باری RegNounInfl ;
بازی:بازی RegNounInfl ;
باسو:باسو RegNounInfl ;
بافر:بافر RegNounInfl ;
باک:باک RegNounInfl ;
پآر:پآر RegNounInfl ;
پأڑ:پأڑ RegNounInfl ;
پَئ:پَئ RegNounInfl ;
پئکڑے:پئکڑے RegNounInfl ;
پاؤ:پاؤ RegNounInfl ;
پابندی:پابندی RegNounInfl ;
پاتکُوڑی:پاتکُوڑی RegNounInfl ;
پاژا:پاژا RegNounInfl ;
پال:پال RegNounInfl ;
پالنَا:پالنَا RegNounInfl ;
پانسی:پانسی RegNounInfl ;
تأت:تأت RegNounInfl ;
تألأشی:تألأشی RegNounInfl ;
تاؤ:تاؤ RegNounInfl ;
تاثیر:تاثیر RegNounInfl ;
تاخ:تاخ RegNounInfl ;
تاݜ:تاݜ RegNounInfl ;
تاکان:تاکان RegNounInfl ;
تالابڑنگ:تالابڑنگ RegNounInfl ;
تالوخ:تالوخ RegNounInfl ;
تامبڑئ:تامبڑئ RegNounInfl ;
تانو:تانو RegNounInfl ;
تاوین:تاوین RegNounInfl ;
تبلیخ:تبلیخ RegNounInfl ;
تجارت:تجارت RegNounInfl ;
تحصیل:تحصیل RegNounInfl ;
تَخ:تَخ RegNounInfl ;
تخَرگئ:تخَرگئ RegNounInfl ;
تداچا:تداچا RegNounInfl ;
تِراؤ:تِراؤ RegNounInfl ;
تراپ:تراپ RegNounInfl ;
تڑ:تڑ RegNounInfl ;
تڑوُن:تڑوُن RegNounInfl ;
تسلی:تسلی RegNounInfl ;
تِش:تِش RegNounInfl ;
تِݜ:تِݜ RegNounInfl ;
تُݜوم:تُݜوم RegNounInfl ;
تفسیر:تفسیر RegNounInfl ;
ثبوت:ثبوت RegNounInfl ;
ٹأ:ٹأ RegNounInfl ;
ٹاپ:ٹاپ RegNounInfl ;
ٹاٹ:ٹاٹ RegNounInfl ;
ٹاٹی:ٹاٹی RegNounInfl ;
ٹال:ٹال RegNounInfl ;
ٹانکا:ٹانکا RegNounInfl ;
ٹانگا:ٹانگا RegNounInfl ;
ٹپال:ٹپال RegNounInfl ;
ٹپوس:ٹپوس RegNounInfl ;
ٹٹی:ٹٹی RegNounInfl ;
ٹَراپَرا:ٹَراپَرا RegNounInfl ;
ٹُرنُوکُو:ٹُرنُوکُو RegNounInfl ;
ٹقألی:ٹقألی RegNounInfl ;
ٹقالے:ٹقالے RegNounInfl ;
ٹُک:ٹُک RegNounInfl ;
ٹکا:ٹکا RegNounInfl ;
ٹکامأری:ٹکامأری RegNounInfl ;
ٹُکروٹ:ٹُکروٹ RegNounInfl ;
ٹِکَس:ٹِکَس RegNounInfl ;
ٹکور:ٹکور RegNounInfl ;
ٹگُون:ٹگُون RegNounInfl ;
ٹلگرے:ٹلگرے RegNounInfl ;
ٹِم:ٹِم RegNounInfl ;
جأڑ:جأڑ RegNounInfl ;
جأل:جأل RegNounInfl ;
جادو:جادو RegNounInfl ;
جاڑ:جاڑ RegNounInfl ;
جال:جال RegNounInfl ;
جام:جام RegNounInfl ;
جامہ:جامہ RegNounInfl ;
جانگئ:جانگئ RegNounInfl ;
جَب:جَب RegNounInfl ;
جبا:جبا RegNounInfl ;
جِتی:جِتی RegNounInfl ;
جَدَک:جَدَک RegNounInfl ;
جذبہ:جذبہ RegNounInfl ;
جرگہ:جرگہ RegNounInfl ;
جُرمانہ:جُرمانہ RegNounInfl ;
جزا:جزا RegNounInfl ;
جَس:جَس RegNounInfl ;
جگھا:جگھا RegNounInfl ;
جماݜ:جماݜ RegNounInfl ;
جمع:جمع RegNounInfl ;
جنت:جنت RegNounInfl ;
جندَرا:جندَرا RegNounInfl ;
جنگرا:جنگرا RegNounInfl ;
جھأمی:جھأمی RegNounInfl ;
جھا:جھا RegNounInfl ;
جھاراخیل:جھاراخیل RegNounInfl ;
LEXICON Adjectives
بژیل:بژیل ADJ ;
لوٷ:لوٷ ADJ ;
کم:کم ADJ ;
بُٹ:بُٹ ADJ ;
خپا:خپا ADJ ;
آباد:آباد ADJ ;
آختہ:آختہ ADJ ;
آخیر:آخیر ADJ ;
آخیری:آخیری ADJ ;
آراما:آراما ADJ ;
أخیری:أخیری ADJ ;
أدی:أدی ADJ ;
أشیمیل:أشیمیل ADJ ;
أشیویل:أشیویل ADJ ;
أم:أم ADJ ;
أمی:أمی ADJ ;
اُپُھٹ:اُپُھٹ ADJ ;
اِتیفاقی:اِتیفاقی ADJ ;
اٹالا:اٹالا ADJ ;
اٹھاشم:اٹھاشم ADJ ;
اجیبا:اجیبا ADJ ;
اجیز:اجیز ADJ ;
اُچات:اُچات ADJ ;
اَخکارہ:اَخکارہ ADJ ;
اخلأصی:اخلأصی ADJ ;
اِدبأری:اِدبأری ADJ ;
اَر:اَر ADJ ;
ارپَن:ارپَن ADJ ;
ارَتأپرَتأ:ارَتأپرَتأ ADJ ;
ارَتر:ارَت ADJ ;
ارزال:ارزال ADJ ;
ارزان:ارزان ADJ ;
ارزومَن:ارزومَن ADJ ;
بألُک:بألُک ADJ ;
بئیدار:بئیدار ADJ ;
باٹا:باٹا ADJ ;
باچَیئ:باچَیئ ADJ ;
بادر:بادر ADJ ;
باڈیدار:باڈیدار ADJ ;
بار:بار ADJ ;
باریک:باریک ADJ ;
بازأری:بازأری ADJ ;
بالِغ:بالِغ ADJ ;
بان:بان ADJ ;
بُٹ:بُٹ ADJ ;
بختور:بختور ADJ ;
بخیل:بخیل ADJ ;
بدعَملہ:بدعَملہ ADJ ;
بدخُویا:بدخُویا ADJ ;
بدکارا:بدکارا ADJ ;
بدگُنیا:بدگُنیا ADJ ;
بَدَل:بَدَل ADJ ;
بدمعاش:بدمعاش ADJ ;
بدنام:بدنام ADJ ;
بدنصیبا:بدنصیبا ADJ ;
آراما:آراما ADJ ;
اَوتر:اَوتر ADJ ;
آژُوک:آژُوک ADJ ;
انان:انان ADJ ;
اَنّ:اَنّ ADJ ;
گوشتی:گوشتی ADJ ;
ہریک:ہریک ADJ ;
ہرکآم:ہرکآم ADJ ;
کمَصل:کمَصل ADJ ;
LEXICON Postpositions
دے:دے POST ;
کو:کو POST ;
آ:آ POST ;
سی:سی POST ;
ما:ما POST ;
با:با POST ;
بارا:بارا POST ;
بھار:بھار POST ;
پَرے	:پَرے POST ;
پورے:پورے POST ;
تے:تے POST ;
ٹَین:ٹَین POST ;
چی:چی POST ;
خوا:خوا POST ;
دے:دے POST ;
زیت:زیت POST ;
سُون:سُون POST ;
سیت:سیت POST ;
کأ:کأ POST ;
کیژا:کیژا POST ;
کے:کے POST ;
گے:گے POST ;
می:می POST ;
وا:وا POST ;
یے:یے POST ;
آ:آ POST ;	
أ:أ	POST ;
اَبن:اَبن	POST ;
اَپن:اَپن	POST ;
اِسی:اِسی	POST ;
امَن:امَن	POST ;
اِی:اِی POST ;
ایز:ایز	POST ;
اے:اے POST ;	
پَۓ:پَۓ POST ;	
تأ:تأ POST ;	
تِسی:تِسی	POST ;
تُنتُنو:تُنتُنو POST ;	
تھأ:تھأ	POST ;
تھأ:تھأ	POST ;
تھأ:تھأ	POST ;
تُھن:تُھن	POST ;
تھو:تھو	POST ;
تھوئے:تھوئے	POST ;
تھوئے:تھوئے	POST ;
تھیت:تھیت POST ;	
تِھین:تِھین POST ;	
تھیۓ:تھیۓ POST ;	
تھے:تھے	POST ;
تُو:تُو POST ;	
تُونُو:تُونُو POST ;	
تی:تی POST ;	
تی:تی POST ;	
تَیس:تَیس	POST ;
تے:تے POST ;	
چھی:چھی POST ;	
سے:سے POST ;	
کآم:کآم	POST ;
کآم:کآم POST ;	
کا:کا POST ;	
کامیک:کامیک POST ;	
کِسی:کِسی POST ;	
کَھدات:کَھدات POST ;	
کِھین:کِھین POST ;	
کینئس:کینئس POST ;	
کیںیں:کیںیں POST ;	
مأ:مأ POST ;	
مھأ:مھأ POST ;	
مھأ:مھأ POST ;	
مُھن:مُھن POST ;	
مِھن:مِھن POST ;	
مھو:مھو POST ;	
مھوئے:مھوئے POST ;	
مھوئے:مھوئے POST ;	
مِھی:مِھی POST ;	
مھے:مھے	POST ;
مے:مے POST ;	
ہِین:ہِین	POST ;
ہے:ہے POST ;	
یِی:یِی POST ;	
ییسی:ییسی POST ;
